Wisconsin, session 2025, SB851.
do enact as follows:SB851,13Section 1. 100.72 of the statutes is created to read:SB851,2,24100.72 Use of live animals in medical training. (1) An educational 5institution may not use live animals in this state to train medical students, 1residents, fellows, interns, or physicians in the medical treatment of human beings 2if any of the following applies:SB851,2,43(a) At least one other accredited training program in this state in the same 4medical discipline does not use live animals.SB851,2,85(b) There is an alternate teaching method or accredited course that provides 6equivalent training without the use of live animals, which alternate teaching 7method may include human cadavers, high-fidelity synthetic simulators, virtual 8reality models, or other alternatives modeled on human anatomy.SB851,2,109(2) Any person who violates sub. (1) shall be required to forfeit $1,000 for each 10live animal used in violation of sub. (1).SB851,2,1111